District of Columbia statutes.
38-920

Aeronautics courses authorized.

The Board of Education is hereby authorized and directed to establish and to include in the curricula of the senior high schools of the District of Columbia, as an additional optional course, a course in aeronautics, which shall include instruction in aerodynamics, the theory of flight, the airplane and its engine, mechanics, engineering, meteorology, practical air navigation, map reading, and such other allied subjects as the Board in its discretion may deem it advisable to prescribe. Such course shall be 1st offered during the high-school term beginning in 1942. Thereafter such additional courses in aeronautics may be added as deemed desirable by the Board of Education. The same credit toward graduation may be given for said course as is given for other optional courses in said schools.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 806, ch. 585, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 31-901.
1973 Ed., § 31-1201.

Prior Codifications